California statutes. Labor Code
(1) Notice that the utilization review decision is final unless the employee requests independent medical review.

(2) A statement indicating the employee’s consent to obtain any necessary medical records from the employer or insurer and from any medical provider the employee may have consulted on the matter, to be signed by the employee.

(3) Notice of the employee’s right to provide information or documentation, either directly or through the employee’s physician, regarding the following:

(A) The treating physician’s
 recommendation indicating that the disputed medical treatment is medically necessary for the employee’s medical condition.

(B) Medical information or justification that a disputed medical treatment, on an urgent care or emergency basis, was medically necessary for the employee’s medical condition.

(C) Reasonable information supporting the employee’s position that the disputed medical treatment is or was medically necessary for the employee’s medical condition, including all information provided to the employee by the employer or by the treating physician, still in the employee’s possession, concerning the employer’s or the physician’s decision regarding the disputed medical treatment, as well as any additional material that the employee believes is relevant.

(g) The independent medical review process may be
 terminated at any time upon the employer’s written authorization of the disputed medical treatment. Notice of the authorization, any settlement or award that may resolve the medical treatment dispute, or the requesting physician withdrawing the request for treatment, shall be communicated to the independent medical review organization by the employer within five days.

(h) (1) The employee may submit a request for independent medical review to the division. The request may be made electronically under rules adopted by the administrative director. The request shall be made no later than as follows:

(A) For formulary disputes, 10 days after the service of the utilization review decision to the employee.

(B) For all other medical treatment disputes, 30 days after the service of the utilization
 review decision to the employee.

(2) If at the time of a utilization review decision the employer is also disputing liability for the treatment for any reason besides medical necessity, the time for the employee to submit a request for independent medical review to the administrative director or administrative director’s designee is extended to 30 days after service of a notice to the employee showing that the other dispute of liability has been resolved.

(3) If the employer fails to comply with subdivision (f) at the time of notification of its utilization review decision, the time limitations for the employee to submit a request for independent medical review shall not begin to run until the employer provides the required notice to the employee.

(4) A provider of emergency medical treatment
 when the employee faced an imminent and serious threat to his or her health, including, but not limited to, the potential loss of life, limb, or other major bodily function, may submit a request for independent medical review on its own behalf. A request submitted by a provider pursuant to this paragraph shall be submitted to the administrative director or administrative director’s designee within the time limitations applicable for an employee to submit a request for independent medical review.

(i) An employer shall not engage in any conduct that has the effect of delaying the independent review process. Engaging in that conduct or failure of the employer to promptly comply with this section is a violation of this section and, in addition to any other fines, penalties, and other remedies available to the administrative director, the employer shall be subject to an administrative penalty in an amount determined pursuant to regulations to be
 adopted by the administrative director, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day that proper notification to the employee is delayed. The administrative penalties shall be paid to the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund.

(j) For purposes of this section, an employee may designate a parent, guardian, conservator, relative, or other designee of the employee as an agent to act on his or her behalf. A designation of an agent executed prior to the utilization review decision shall not be valid. The requesting physician may join with or otherwise assist the employee in seeking an independent medical review, and may advocate on behalf of the employee.

(k) The administrative director or his or her designee shall expeditiously review requests and immediately notify the employee and the employer in writing as to whether the request for an independent medical
 review has been approved, in whole or in part, and, if not approved, the reasons therefor. If there appears to be any medical necessity issue, the dispute shall be resolved pursuant to an independent medical review, except that, unless the employer agrees that the case is eligible for independent medical review, a request for independent medical review shall be deferred if at the time of a utilization review decision the employer is also disputing liability for the treatment for any reason besides medical necessity.

(l) Upon notice from the administrative director that an independent review organization has been assigned, the employer shall electronically provide to the independent medical review organization under rules adopted by the administrative director a copy and list of all of the following documents within 10 days of notice of assignment:

(1) A copy of all of the
 employee’s medical records in the possession of the employer or under the control of the employer relevant to each of the following:

(A) The employee’s current medical condition.

(B) The medical treatment being provided by the employer.

(C) The request for authorization and utilization review decision.

(2) A copy of all information provided to the employee by the employer concerning employer and provider decisions regarding the disputed treatment.

(3) A copy of any materials the employee or the employee’s provider submitted to the employer in support of the employee’s request for the disputed treatment.

(4) A copy of any
 other relevant documents or information used by the employer or its utilization review organization in determining whether the disputed treatment should have been provided, and any statements by the employer or its utilization review organization explaining the reasons for the decision to deny or modify the recommended treatment on the basis of medical necessity. The employer shall concurrently provide a copy of the documents required by this paragraph to the employee and the requesting physician, except that documents previously provided to the employee or physician need not be provided again if a list of those documents is provided.

(m) Any newly developed or discovered relevant medical records in the possession of the employer after the initial documents are provided to the independent medical review organization shall be forwarded immediately to the independent medical review organization. The employer shall concurrently provide a copy of
 medical records required by this subdivision to the employee or the employee’s treating physician, unless the offer of medical records is declined or otherwise prohibited by law. The confidentiality of medical records shall be maintained pursuant to applicable state and federal laws.

(n) If there is an imminent and serious threat to the health of the employee, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 1374.33 of the Health and Safety Code, all necessary information and documents required by subdivision (l) shall be delivered to the independent medical review organization within 24 hours of approval of the request for review.

(o) The employer shall promptly issue a notification to the employee, after submitting all of the required material to the independent medical review organization, that lists documents submitted and includes copies
 of material not previously provided to the employee or the employee’s designee.

(p) The claims administrator who issued the utilization review decision in dispute shall notify the independent medical review organization if there is a change in the claims administrator responsible for the claim. Notice shall be given to the independent medical review organization within five working days of the change in administrator taking effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 868, Sec. 5.   (SB 1160)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4610.6.

(a) Upon receipt of a case pursuant to Section 4610.5, an independent medical review organization shall conduct the review in accordance with this article and any regulations or orders of the administrative director. The organization’s review shall be limited to an examination of the medical necessity of the disputed medical treatment.

(b) Upon receipt of information and documents related to a case, the medical reviewer or reviewers selected to conduct the review by the independent medical review organization shall promptly review all pertinent medical records of the employee, provider reports, and any other information submitted to the organization or requested from any of the parties to the dispute by the reviewers. If the reviewers request information from any
 of the parties, a copy of the request and the response shall be provided to all of the parties. The reviewer or reviewers shall also review relevant information related to the criteria set forth in subdivision (c).

(c) Following its review, the reviewer or reviewers shall determine whether the disputed health care service was medically necessary based on the specific medical needs of the employee and the standards of medical necessity as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4610.5.

(d) (1) The organization shall complete its review and make its determination in writing, and in layperson’s terms to the maximum extent practicable, and the determination shall be issued, as follows:

(A) For a dispute over medication prescribed pursuant to the drug formulary submitted under subdivision (h) of
 Section 4610.5, within five working days from the date of receipt of the request for review and supporting documentation, or within less time as prescribed by the administrative director.

(B) For all other medical treatment disputes submitted for review under subdivision (h) of Section 4610.5, within 30 days of receipt of the request for review and supporting documentation, or within less time as prescribed by the administrative director.

(C) If the disputed medical treatment has not been provided and the employee’s provider or the administrative director certifies in writing that an imminent and serious threat to the health of the employee may exist, including, but not limited to, serious pain, the potential loss of life, limb, or major bodily function, or the immediate and serious deterioration of the health of the employee, the analyses and determinations of the reviewers shall
 be expedited and rendered within three days of the receipt of the information.

(2) Subject to the approval of the administrative director, the deadlines for analyses and determinations involving both regular and expedited reviews may be extended for up to three days in extraordinary circumstances or for good cause.

(e) The medical professionals’ analyses and determinations shall state whether the disputed health care service is medically necessary. Each analysis shall cite the employee’s medical condition, the relevant documents in the record, and the relevant findings associated with the provisions of subdivision (c) to support the determination. If more than one medical professional reviews the case, the recommendation of the majority shall prevail. If the medical professionals reviewing the case are evenly split as to whether the disputed health care service should be provided,
 the decision shall be in favor of providing the service.

(f) The independent medical review organization shall provide the administrative director, the employer, the employee, and the employee’s provider with the analyses and determinations of the medical professionals reviewing the case, and a description of the qualifications of the medical professionals. The independent medical review organization shall keep the names of the reviewers confidential in all communications with entities or individuals outside the independent medical review organization. If more than one medical professional reviewed the case and the result was differing determinations, the independent medical review organization shall provide each of the separate reviewer’s analyses and determinations.

(g) The determination of the independent medical review organization shall be deemed to be the determination of
 the administrative director and shall be binding on all parties.

(h) A determination of the administrative director pursuant to this section may be reviewed only by a verified appeal from the medical review determination of the administrative director, filed with the appeals board for hearing pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Part 4 and served on all interested parties within 30 days of the date of mailing of the determination to the aggrieved employee or the aggrieved employer. The determination of the administrative director shall be presumed to be correct and shall be set aside only upon proof by clear and convincing evidence of one or more of the following grounds for appeal:

(1) The administrative director acted without or in excess of the administrative director’s powers.

(2) The
 determination of the administrative director was procured by fraud.

(3) The independent medical reviewer was subject to a material conflict of interest that is in violation of Section 139.5.

(4) The determination was the result of bias on the basis of race, national origin, ethnic group identification, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, color, or disability.

(5) The determination was the result of a plainly erroneous express or implied finding of fact, provided that the mistake of fact is a matter of ordinary knowledge based on the information submitted for review pursuant to Section 4610.5 and not a matter that is subject to expert opinion.

(i) If the determination of the administrative director is reversed, the dispute shall be remanded to the
 administrative director to submit the dispute to independent medical review by a different independent review organization. In the event that a different independent medical review organization is not available after remand, the administrative director shall submit the dispute to the original medical review organization for review by a different reviewer in the organization. In no event shall a workers’ compensation administrative law judge, the appeals board, or any higher court make a determination of medical necessity contrary to the determination of the independent medical review organization.

(j) Upon receiving the determination of the administrative director that a disputed health care service is medically necessary, the employer shall promptly implement the decision as provided by this section unless the employer has also disputed liability for any reason besides medical necessity. In the case of reimbursement for services already
 rendered, the employer shall reimburse the provider or employee, whichever applies, within 20 days, subject to resolution of any remaining issue of the amount of payment pursuant to Sections 4603.2 to 4603.6, inclusive. In the case of services not yet rendered, the employer shall authorize the services within five working days of receipt of the written determination from the independent medical review organization, or sooner if appropriate for the nature of the employee’s medical condition, and shall inform the employee and provider of the authorization.

(k) Failure to pay for services already provided or to authorize services not yet rendered within the time prescribed by subdivision (l) is a violation of this section and, in addition to any other fines, penalties, and other remedies available to the administrative director, the employer shall be subject to an administrative penalty in an amount determined pursuant to regulations to be adopted
 by the administrative director, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day the decision is not implemented. The administrative penalties shall be paid to the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund.

(l) The costs of independent medical review and the administration of the independent medical review system shall be borne by employers through a fee system established by the administrative director. After considering any relevant information on program costs, the administrative director shall establish a reasonable, per-case reimbursement schedule to pay the costs of independent medical review organization reviews and the cost of administering the independent medical review system, which may vary depending on the type of medical condition under review and on other relevant factors.

(m) The administrative director may publish the results of independent
 medical review determinations after removing individually identifiable information.

(n) If any provision of this section, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid, the remainder of the section, and the application of its provisions to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 868, Sec. 6.   (SB 1160)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4611.

(a) When a contracting agent sells, leases, or transfers a health provider’s contract to a payor, the rights and obligations of the provider shall be governed by the underlying contract between the health care provider and the contracting agent.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Contracting agent” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 4609.

(2) “Payor” has the meaning set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 4609.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4610 (as added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 203) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 264.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4614.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 5307.1, where the employee’s individual or organizational provider of health care services rendered under this division and paid on a fee-for-service basis is also the provider of health care services under contract with the employee’s health benefit program, and the service or treatment provided is included within the range of benefits of the employee’s health benefit program, and paid on a fee-for-service basis, the amount of payment for services provided under this division, for a work-related occurrence or illness, shall be no more than the amount that would have been paid for the same services under the health benefit plan, for a non-work-related occurrence or illness.

(2) A health care service plan that arranges for health care services to be rendered to an employee under this division under a contract, and which is also the employee’s organizational provider for nonoccupational injuries and illnesses, with the exception of a nonprofit health care service plan that exclusively contracts with a medical group to provide or arrange for medical services to its enrollees in a designated geographic area, shall be paid by the employer for services rendered under this division only on a capitated basis.

(b) (1) Where the employee’s individual or organizational provider of health care services rendered under this division who is not providing services under a contract is not the provider of health care services under contract with the employee’s health benefit program or where the services rendered under this division are not within the benefits provided under the employer-sponsored health benefit program, the provider shall receive payment that is no more than the average of the payment that would have been paid by five of the largest preferred provider organizations by geographic region. Physicians, as defined in Section 3209.3, shall be reimbursed at the same averaged rates, regardless of licensure, for the delivery of services under the same procedure code. This subdivision shall not apply to a health care service plan that provides its services on a capitated basis.

(2) The administrative director shall identify the regions and the five largest carriers in each region. The carriers shall provide the necessary information to the administrative director in the form and manner requested by the administrative director. The administrative director shall make this information available to the affected providers on an annual basis.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an individual or organizational health care provider from being paid fees different from those set forth in the official medical fee schedule by an employer, insurance carrier, third-party administrator on behalf of employers, or preferred provider organization representing an employer or insurance carrier provided that the administrative director has determined that the alternative negotiated rates between the organizational or individual provider and a payer, a third-party administrator on behalf of employers, or a preferred provider organization will produce greater savings in the aggregate than if each item on billings were to be charged at the scheduled rate.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “organizational provider” means an entity that arranges for health care services to be rendered directly by individual caregivers. An organizational provider may be a health care service plan, disability insurer, health care organization, preferred provider organization, or workers’ compensation insurer arranging for care through a managed care network or on a fee-for-service basis. An individual provider is either an individual or institution that provides care directly to the injured worker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 866, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4614.1.

Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code, a health care service plan licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act and certified by the administrative director pursuant to Section 4600.5 to provide health care pursuant to Section 4600.3 shall be permitted to accept payment from a self-insured employer, a group of self-insured employers, or the insurer of an employer on a fee-for-service basis for the provision of such health care as long as the health care service plan is not both the health care organization in which the employee is enrolled and the plan through which the employee receives regular health benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1242, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4615.

(a) Upon the filing of criminal charges against a physician, practitioner, or provider for any crime described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 139.21, the following shall occur:

(1) Any lien filed by, or on behalf of, the physician, practitioner, or provider or any entity controlled, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 139.21, by the physician, practitioner, or provider for medical treatment services under Section 4600 or medical-legal services under Section 4621, and any accrual of interest related to the lien, shall be automatically stayed.

(2) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the stay shall be in effect from the time of the
 filing of the charges until the disposition of the criminal proceedings.

(b) Upon conviction, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 139.21, of the physician, practitioner, or provider for any crime described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 139.21, the automatic stay shall remain in effect for any liens not dismissed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 139.21 until the commencement of lien consolidation procedures under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 139.21.

(c) The automatic stay required by this section shall not preclude a physician, practitioner, or provider from requesting the dismissal with prejudice and forfeiture of sums claimed therein of any liens subject to the stay. Upon the receipt of that request and for good cause shown, the chief judge of the Division of Workers Compensation or
 his or her designee may lift the stay as to one or more of those liens and order that they be dismissed with prejudice.

(d) The administrative director shall promptly post on the division’s Internet Web site the names of any physician, practitioner, or provider of medical treatment services whose liens are stayed pursuant to this section.

(e) The automatic stay required by this section shall not preclude the appeals board from inquiring into and determining within a workers’ compensation proceeding whether a lien is stayed pursuant to subdivision (a) or whether a lien claimant is controlled by a physician, practitioner, or provider.

(f) The administrative director may adopt rules for the implementation of this section.

(g) Notwithstanding this section,
 the filing of new or additional criminal charges against a physician, practitioner, or provider who has been suspended pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 139.21 shall not stay liens that are subject to consolidation and adjudication pursuant to subdivisions (e) to (i), inclusive, of Section 139.21, unless a determination has been made pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 139.21 that a lien did not arise from the conduct that subjected the physician, practitioner, or provider to suspension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 300, Sec. 3.   (AB 1422)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.3. Medical Provider Networks [4616. - 4616.7.]

4616.

(a) (1) An insurer, employer, or entity that provides physician network services may establish or modify a medical provider network for the provision of medical treatment to injured employees. The network shall include physicians primarily engaged in the treatment of occupational injuries. The administrative director shall encourage the integration of occupational and nonoccupational providers. Subject to Section 3209.11, the number of physicians in the medical provider network shall be sufficient to enable treatment for injuries or conditions to be provided in a timely manner. The provider network shall include
 an adequate number and type of physicians, as described in Section 3209.3, or other providers, as described in Section 3209.5, to treat common injuries experienced by injured employees based on the type of occupation or industry in which the employee is engaged, and the geographic area where the employees are employed.

(2) Medical treatment for injuries shall be readily available at reasonable times to all employees. To the extent feasible, all medical treatment for injuries shall be readily accessible to all employees. With respect to availability and accessibility of treatment, the administrative director shall consider the needs of rural areas, specifically those in which health facilities are located at least 30 miles apart and areas in which there is a health care shortage.

(3) A treating physician shall be included in the network only if, at the time of entering into or
 renewing an agreement by which the physician would be in the network, the physician, or an authorized employee of the physician or the physician’s office, provides a separate written acknowledgment in which the physician affirmatively elects to be a member of the network. Copies of the written acknowledgment shall be provided to the administrative director upon the administrative director’s request. This paragraph shall not apply to a physician who is a shareholder, partner, or employee of a medical group that elects to be part of the network.

(4) (A) (i) Commencing July 1, 2021, every medical provider network shall post on its internet website a roster of all participating providers, which includes all physicians and ancillary service providers in the medical provider network, and shall update the roster at least quarterly. Every network shall provide to the administrative director the internet
 website address of the network and of its roster of participating providers. The roster of participating providers shall include, at a minimum, the name of each individual provider and their office address and office telephone number. If the ancillary service is provided by an entity rather than an individual, then that entity’s name, address, and telephone number shall be listed.

(ii) The administrative director shall post, on the division’s internet website, the internet website address of every approved medical provider network.

(B) Every medical provider network shall post on its internet website information about how to contact the medical provider network contact and medical access assistants, and information about how to obtain a copy of any notification regarding the medical provider network that is required to be given to an employee by regulations adopted by the
 administrative director.

(5) Every medical provider network shall provide one or more persons within the United States to serve as medical access assistants to help an injured employee find an available physician of the employee’s choice, and subsequent physicians if necessary, under Section 4616.3. Medical access assistants shall have a toll-free telephone number that injured employees may use and shall be available at least from 7 a.m. to 8 p.m. Pacific standard time, Monday through Saturday, to respond to injured employees, contact physicians’ offices during regular business hours, and schedule appointments. The administrative director shall promulgate regulations governing the provision of medical access assistants.

(b) (1) An insurer, employer, or entity that provides physician network services shall submit a plan for the medical provider network to the
 administrative director for approval. The administrative director shall approve the plan for a period of four years if the administrative director determines that the plan meets the requirements of this section. If the administrative director does not act on the plan within 60 days of submitting the plan, it shall be deemed approved. Commencing January 1, 2014, existing approved plans shall be deemed approved for a period of four years from the approval date of the most recent application or modification submitted prior to 2014. Plans for reapproval for medical provider networks shall be submitted at least six months before the expiration of the four-year approval period. Commencing January 1, 2016, a modification that updates an entire medical provider network plan to bring the plan into full compliance with all current statutes and regulations shall be deemed approved for a period of four years from the modification approval date. An approved modification that does not update an entire medical provider
 network plan to bring the plan into full compliance with all current statutes and regulations shall not alter the expiration of the medical provider network’s four-year approval period. Upon a showing that the medical provider network was approved or deemed approved by the administrative director, there shall be a conclusive presumption on the part of the appeals board that the medical provider network was validly formed.

(2) Every medical provider network shall establish and follow procedures to continuously review the quality of care, performance of medical personnel, utilization of services and facilities, and costs.

(3) Every medical provider network shall submit geocoding of its network for reapproval to establish that the number and geographic location of physicians in the network meets the required access standards.

(4) Approval of a plan may be denied, revoked, or suspended if the medical provider network fails to meet the requirements of this article. Any person contending that a medical provider network is not validly constituted may petition the administrative director to suspend or revoke the approval of the medical provider network. The administrative director may adopt regulations establishing a schedule of administrative penalties not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation, or probation, or both, in lieu of revocation or suspension for less severe violations of the requirements of this article. Penalties, probation, suspension, or revocation shall be ordered by the administrative director only after notice and opportunity to be heard. Unless suspended or revoked by the administrative director, the administrative director’s approval of a medical provider network shall be binding on all persons and all courts. A determination of the administrative director may be reviewed only by an
 appeal of the determination of the administrative director filed as an original proceeding before the reconsideration unit of the workers’ compensation appeals board on the same grounds and within the same time limits after issuance of the determination as would be applicable to a petition for reconsideration of a decision of a workers’ compensation administrative law judge.

(c) Physician compensation may not be structured in order to achieve the goal of reducing, delaying, or denying medical treatment or restricting access to medical treatment.

(d) If the employer or insurer meets the requirements of this section, the administrative director may not withhold approval or disapprove an employer’s or insurer’s medical provider network based solely on the selection of providers. In developing a medical provider network, an employer or insurer shall have the exclusive right to
 determine the members of their network.

(e) All treatment provided shall be provided in accordance with the medical treatment utilization schedule established pursuant to Section 5307.27.

(f) Only a licensed physician who is competent to evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the medical treatment services, when these services are within the scope of the physician’s practice, may modify, delay, or deny requests for authorization of medical treatment.

(g) Every contracting agent that sells, leases, assigns, transfers, or conveys its medical provider networks and their contracted reimbursement rates to an insurer, employer, entity that provides physician network services, or another contracting agent shall, upon entering or renewing a provider contract, disclose to the provider whether the medical provider
 network may be sold, leased, transferred, or conveyed to other insurers, employers, entities that provide physician network services, or another contracting agent, and specify whether those insurers, employers, entities that provide physician network services, or contracting agents include workers’ compensation insurers.

(h) On or before November 1, 2004, the administrative director, in consultation with the Department of Managed Health Care, shall adopt regulations implementing this article. The administrative director shall develop regulations that establish procedures for purposes of making medical provider network modifications.

(i) The administrative director has the authority and discretion to investigate complaints, conduct random reviews, and take enforcement action against medical provider networks, an entity that provides ancillary services, or an entity providing
 services for or on behalf of the medical provider network or its providers regarding noncompliance with the requirements of this section or Section 4603.2 or 4610.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 609, Sec. 6.   (SB 1002)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4616.1.

(a) An insurer, employer, or entity that provides physician network services that offers a medical provider network under this division and that uses economic profiling shall file with the administrative director a description of any policies and procedures related to economic profiling utilized. The filing shall describe how these policies and procedures are used in utilization review, peer review, incentive and penalty programs, and in provider retention and termination decisions. The insurer, employer, or entity that provides physician network services shall provide a copy of the filing to an individual physician, provider, medical group, or individual practice association.

(b) The administrative director shall make each
 approved medical provider network economic profiling policy filing available to the public upon request. The administrative director may not publicly disclose any information submitted pursuant to this section that is determined by the administrative director to be confidential pursuant to state or federal law.

(c) For the purposes of this article, “economic profiling” shall mean any evaluation of a particular physician, provider, medical group, or individual practice association based in whole or in part on the economic costs or utilization of services associated with medical care provided or authorized by the physician, provider, medical group, or individual practice association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 363, Sec. 48.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4616.2.

(a) A medical provider network shall file a written continuity of care policy with the administrative director.

(b) If approved by the administrative director, the provisions of the written continuity of care policy shall replace all prior continuity of care policies. A medical provider network shall file a revision of the continuity of care policy with the administrative director if it makes a material change to the policy.

(c) The medical provider network shall provide all employees entering the workers’
 compensation system notice of the medical provider network’s written continuity of care policy and information regarding the process for an employee to request a review under the policy and, upon request, a copy of the medical provider network’s written continuity of care policy.

(d) (1) At the request of an injured employee, completion of treatment shall be provided by a terminated provider as set forth in this section.

(2) The completion of treatment shall be provided by a terminated provider to an injured employee who, at the time of the contract’s termination, was receiving services from that provider for one of the conditions described in paragraph (3).

(3) The employer or its claims
 administrator shall provide for the completion of treatment for the following conditions subject to coverage through the workers’ compensation system:

(A) An acute condition. An acute condition is a medical condition that involves a sudden onset of symptoms due to an illness, injury, or other medical problem that requires prompt medical attention and that has a limited duration. Completion of treatment shall be provided for the duration of the acute condition.
